Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-235.04
Hospital; sinking fund; investment.

A governmental subdivision shall have the power and authority to invest and reinvest all idle funds in the hospital sinking fund, including but not limited to current tax receipts for such period of time as such funds are not immediately needed, in evidences of indebtedness of the United States Government and agencies thereof.

Laws 1961, c. 38, § 5, p. 166.